California, session 20252026, AB448.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 129400) is added to Part 6 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 5. Health Facility Grants and Loans129400. The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:(a) “Authority” means the California Health Facilities Financing Authority.(b) “Nondesignated public hospital” means a public hospital as that term is defined in subdivision (l) of Section 14165.55 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, excluding those affiliated with county health systems.129401. (a) The authority shall extend the repayment period as described in subdivision (b) for nondesignated public hospitals participating in the loan program authorized under Provision (1) of Item 0977-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chapter 45 of the Statutes of 2022) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the authority, and that the authority has determined were unable to repay their loan by the time required under the loan and security agreement. (b) Notwithstanding Provision (1)(e) of Item 0977-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chapter 45 of the Statutes of 2022) and any other law to the contrary, a nondesignated public hospital participating in the loan program described in subdivision (a) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the authority shall be required to begin monthly repayments on the loan 36 months after the date of that loan, and shall discharge the loan within 60 months of the date of that loan. The monthly payments shall be amortized over the term of the loan, at 0 percent interest. There shall be no prepayment penalty.(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this section shall not be construed to amend or otherwise affect the requirements of, or the authorities conferred to implement, the loan program pursuant to Provision (1) of Item 0977-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chapter 45 of the Statutes of 2022).SECTION 1.Section 1562.015 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1562.015.(a)In addition to the requirements of Section 1562.01, a short-term residential therapeutic program shall do all of the following:(1)Prior to accepting a child or youth for treatment, ensure that at least one parent, or a legal guardian, will be residing at single, physical address within the state for the duration of the child’s or youth’s treatment.(2)Ensure that a child or youth residing in the program facility is at all times able to make confidential telephone calls to their parent or legal guardian. This requirement is subject to waiver by the department, the short-term residential therapeutic program, or the parent or guardian.(3)Ensure that a child or youth residing in the program facility has access at all times to appropriate footwear that is suitable to be worn outdoors.(b)The short-term residential therapeutic program shall prominently post the requirements described in subdivision (a) on its internet website.(c)A short-term residential therapeutic program that violates the requirements described in subdivision (a) shall be subject to civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ____ dollars ($____) per violation per day. The total civil penalty shall not exceed ____ dollars ($____). If a violation causes harm to a child’s or youth’s health or safety, the department may also suspend or revoke the short-term residential therapeutic program’s license.(d)The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement, interpret, or make specific the requirements of this section.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.